Illinois, session 104th, HB5.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.5-105 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-105)7    Sec. 5-4.5-105. SENTENCING OF INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 821 18 AT THE TIME OF THE COMMISSION OF AN OFFENSE.9    (a) On or after January 1, 2016 (the effective date of 10Public Act 99-69 and before the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly), when a person 12commits an offense and the person is under 18 years of age at 13the time of the commission of the offense, the court, at the 14sentencing hearing conducted under Section 5-4-1, shall 15consider the following additional factors in mitigation in 16determining the appropriate sentence:17        (1) the person's age, impetuosity, and level of 18    maturity at the time of the offense, including the ability 19    to consider risks and consequences of behavior, and the 20    presence of cognitive or developmental disability, or 21    both, if any;22        (2) whether the person was subjected to outside 23    pressure, including peer pressure, familial pressure, or   HB0005- 2 -LRB104 03393 RLC 13415 b1    negative influences;2        (3) the person's family, home environment, educational 3    and social background, including any history of parental 4    neglect, domestic or sexual violence, sexual exploitation, 5    physical abuse, or other childhood trauma including 6    adverse childhood experiences (or ACEs);7        (4) the person's potential for rehabilitation or 8    evidence of rehabilitation, or both;9        (5) the circumstances of the offense;10        (6) the person's degree of participation and specific 11    role in the offense, including the level of planning by 12    the defendant before the offense;13        (7) whether the person was able to meaningfully 14    participate in his or her defense;15        (8) the person's prior juvenile or criminal history;16        (9) the person's involvement in the child welfare 17    system;18        (10) involvement of the person in the community;19        (11) if a comprehensive mental health evaluation of 20    the person was conducted by a qualified mental health 21    professional, the outcome of the evaluation; and 22        (12) any other information the court finds relevant 23    and reliable, including an expression of remorse, if 24    appropriate. However, if the person, on advice of counsel 25    chooses not to make a statement, the court shall not 26    consider a lack of an expression of remorse as an   HB0005- 3 -LRB104 03393 RLC 13415 b1    aggravating factor.2    (a-5) On or after the effective date of this amendatory 3Act of the 104th General Assembly, when a person commits an 4offense and the person is under 21 years of age at the time of 5the commission of the offense, the court, at the sentencing 6hearing conducted under Section 5-4-1, shall consider the 7following additional factors in mitigation in determining the 8appropriate sentence: 9        (1) the person's age, impetuosity, and level of 10    maturity at the time of the offense, including the ability 11    to consider risks and consequences of behavior, and the 12    presence of cognitive or developmental disability, or 13    both, if any; 14        (2) whether the person was subjected to outside 15    pressure, including peer pressure, familial pressure, or 16    negative influences; 17        (3) the person's family, home environment, educational 18    and social background, including any history of parental 19    neglect, physical abuse, or other childhood trauma; 20        (4) the person's potential for rehabilitation or 21    evidence of rehabilitation, or both; 22        (5) the circumstances of the offense; 23        (6) the person's degree of participation and specific 24    role in the offense, including the level of planning by 25    the defendant before the offense; 26        (7) whether the person was able to meaningfully   HB0005- 4 -LRB104 03393 RLC 13415 b1    participate in his or her defense; 2        (8) the person's prior juvenile or criminal history; 3    and 4        (9) any other information the court finds relevant and 5    reliable, including an expression of remorse, if 6    appropriate. However, if the person, on advice of counsel 7    chooses not to make a statement, the court shall not 8    consider a lack of an expression of remorse as an 9    aggravating factor. 10    (b) The trial judge shall specify on the record its 11consideration of the factors under subsection (a) of this 12Section.13    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the 14court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the 15individual against whom the person is convicted of committing 16the offense previously committed a crime under Section 10-9, 17Section 11-1.20, Section 11-1.30, Section 11-1.40, Section 1811-1.50, Section 11-1.60, Section 11-6, Section 11-6.5, 19Section 11-6.6, Section 11-9.1, Section 11-14.3, Section 2011-14.4 or Section 11-18.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 21against the person within 3 years before the offense in which 22the person was convicted, the court may, in its discretion:23        (1) transfer the person to juvenile court for 24    sentencing under Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act 25    of 1987;26        (2) depart from any mandatory minimum sentence,   HB0005- 5 -LRB104 03393 RLC 13415 b1    maximum sentence, or sentencing enhancement; or2        (3) suspend any portion of an otherwise applicable 3    sentence.4    (d) Subsection (c) shall be construed as prioritizing the 5successful treatment and rehabilitation of persons under 18 6years of age who are sex crime victims who commit acts of 7violence against their abusers. It is the General Assembly's 8intent that these persons be viewed as victims and provided 9treatment and services in the community and in the juvenile or 10family court system. 11    (e) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g), the 12court may sentence the defendant to any disposition authorized 13for the class of the offense of which he or she was found 14guilty as described in Article 4.5 of this Code, and may, in 15its discretion, decline to impose any otherwise applicable 16sentencing enhancement based upon firearm possession, 17possession with personal discharge, or possession with 18personal discharge that proximately causes great bodily harm, 19permanent disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 20another person.21    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the 22defendant is under 18 at the time of the commission of the 23offense and convicted of first degree murder and would 24otherwise be subject to sentencing under clause (iii), (iv), 25(v), or (vii) of subparagraph (c) of paragraph (1) of 26subsection (a) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code based on the   HB0005- 6 -LRB104 03393 RLC 13415 b1category of persons identified therein, the court shall impose 2a sentence of not less than 40 years of imprisonment, except 3for persons convicted of first degree murder where subsection 4(c) applies. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, 5decline to impose the sentencing enhancements based upon the 6possession or use of a firearm during the commission of the 7offense included in subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1. 8    (g) Fines and assessments, such as fees or administrative 9costs, shall not be ordered or imposed against a minor subject 10to this Code or against the minor's parent, guardian, or legal 11custodian. For the purposes of this subsection (g), "minor" 12has the meaning provided in Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court 13Act of 1987 and includes any minor under the age of 18 14transferred to adult court or excluded from juvenile court 15jurisdiction under Article V of the Juvenile Court Act of 161987. 17(Source: P.A. 103-191, eff. 1-1-24; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 18103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)